North Carolina, session 2025, SB470.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-84.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-84.2. School calendar.
(a) School Calendar. – Each local board of education shall adopt a school calendar
consisting of 215 days all of which shall fall within the fiscal year. A school calendar shall include
the following:
…
(1b) A class schedule in which no class period or subject is scheduled for more
than 50 total minutes of instructional time per instructional day.
…
(a1) Report on School Start and Release Times. – As part of the reporting requirements
under the Uniform Education Reporting System pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(18), each local board
of education shall report to the State Board of Education on the following:
(1) The start time and release time for each school under control of the local board
of education. For the purposes of this subsection, "start time" shall mean the
time of day when academic classes begin for the majority of students enrolled
in the school, and "release time" shall mean the time of day when academic
classes end for the majority of students enrolled in the school. Each local
board of education shall also identify and include additional information in
the report regarding any schools that have a start time or release time that does
not conform to the definitions set forth in this subsection.
(2) A copy of the class period schedule for each school under control of the local
board of education that is in compliance with subdivision (a)(1b) of this
section.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 school year.
*S470-v-1*